tools/hyphen-es-base.tex
% License MIT/X11. See eshyph-make.lua
\patterns{
2no.
.a2 
.e2x
1ñ 2ñ.
1b 4b. 2bb 2bc 2bd 2bf 2bg 2b1h 2bj 2bk     2bm 2bn 2bp 2bq     2bs 2bt 2bv 2bw 2bx 2by 2bz
1c 4c. 2cb 2cc 2cd 2cf 2cg     2cj 2ck     2cm 2cn 2cp 2cq     2cs 2ct 2cv 2cw 2cx 2cy 2cz
1d 4d. 2db 2dc 2dd 2df 2dg 2d1h 2dj 2dk 2dl 2dm 2dn 2dp 2dq     2ds 2dt 2dv 2dw 2dx 2dy 2dz
1f 4f. 2fb 2fc 2fd 2ff 2fg 2f1h 2fj 2fk     2fm 2fn 2fp 2fq     2fs 2ft 2fv 2fw 2fx 2fy 2fz
1g 4g. 2gb 2gc 2gd 2gf 2gg 2g1h 2gj 2gk     2gm 2gn 2gp 2gq     2gs 2gt 2gv 2gw 2gx 2gy 2gz
   4h. 2hb 2hc 2hd 2hf 2hg 2h1h 2hj 2hk 2hl 2hm 2hn 2hp 2hq 2hr 2hs 2ht 2hv 2hw 2hx 2hy 2hz
1j 4j. 2jb 2jc 2jd 2jf 2jg 2j1h 2jj 2jk 2jl 2jm 2jn 2jp 2jq 2jr 2js 2jt 2jv 2jw 2jx 2jy 2jz
1k 4k. 2kb 2kc 2kd 2kf 2kg 2k1h 2kj 2kk     2km 2kn 2kp 2kq     2ks 2kt 2kv 2kw 2kx 2ky 2kz
1l 4l. 2lb 2lc 2ld 2lf 2lg 2l1h 2lj 2lk     2lm 2ln 2lp 2lq 2lr 2ls 2lt 2lv 2lw 2lx 2ly 2lz
1m 4m. 2mb 2mc 2md 2mf 2mg 2m1h 2mj 2mk 2ml 2mm 2mn 2mp 2mq 2mr 2ms 2mt 2mv 2mw 2mx 2my 2mz
1n 4n. 2nb 2nc 2nd 2nf 2ng 2n1h 2nj 2nk 2nl 2nm 2nn 2np 2nq 2nr 2ns 2nt 2nv 2nw 2nx 2ny 2nz
1p 4p. 2pb 2pc 2pd 2pf 2pg 2p1h 2pj 2pk     2pm 2pn 2pp 2pq     2ps 2pt 2pv 2pw 2px 2py 2pz
1q 4q. 2qb 2qc 2qd 2qf 2qg 2q1h 2qj 2qk 2ql 2qm 2qn 2qp 2qq 2qr 2qs 2qt 2qv 2qw 2qx 2qy 2qz
1r 4r. 2rb 2rc 2rd 2rf 2rg 2r1h 2rj 2rk 2rl 2rm 2rn 2rp 2rq     2rs 2rt 2rv 2rw 2rx 2ry 2rz
1s 4s. 2sb 2sc 2sd 2sf 2sg 2s1h 2sj 2sk 2sl 2sm 2sn 2sp 2sq 2sr 2ss 2st 2sv 2sw 2sx 2sy 2sz
1t 4t. 2tb 2tc 2td 2tf 2tg 2t1h 2tj 2tk     2tm 2tn 2tp 2tq     2ts 2tt 2tv 2tw 2tx 2ty 2tz
1v 4v. 2vb 2vc 2vd 2vf 2vg 2v1h 2vj 2vk     2vm 2vn 2vp 2vq     2vs 2vt 2vv 2vw 2vx 2vy 2vz
1w 4w. 2wb 2wc 2wd 2wf 2wg 2w1h 2wj 2wk 2wl 2wm 2wn 2wp 2wq 2wr 2ws 2wt 2wv 2ww 2wx 2wy 2wz
1x 4x. 2xb 2xc 2xd 2xf 2xg 2x1h 2xj 2xk 2xl 2xm 2xn 2xp 2xq 2xr 2xs 2xt 2xv 2xw 2xx 2xy 2xz
1y 4y. 2yb 2yc 2yd 2yf 2yg 2y1h 2yj 2yk 2yl 2ym 2yn 2yp 2yq 2yr 2ys 2yt 2yv 2yw 2yx 2yy 2yz
1z 4z. 2zb 2zc 2zd 2zf 2zg 2z1h 2zj 2zk 2zl 2zm 2zn 2zp 2zq 2zr 2zs 2zt 2zv 2zw 2zx 2zy 2zz
c4h 4ch. 2chb 2chc 2chd 2chf 2chg 2chh 2chj 2chk ch2l 2chm 2chn 2chp 2chq ch2r 2chs 2cht 2chv 2chw 2chx 2chy 2chz
l4l 4ll. 2llb 2llc 2lld 2llf 2llg 2llh 2llj 2llk 2lll 2llm 2lln 2llp 2llq 2llr 2lls 2llt 2llv 2llw 2llx 2lly 2llz
b2l 4bl. 2blb 2blc 2bld 2blf 2blg 2blh 2blj 2blk 2bll 2blm 2bln 2blp 2blq 2blr 2bls 2blt 2blv 2blw 2blx 2bly 2blz
c2l 4cl. 2clb 2clc 2cld 2clf 2clg 2clh 2clj 2clk 2cll 2clm 2cln 2clp 2clq 2clr 2cls 2clt 2clv 2clw 2clx 2cly 2clz
f2l 4fl. 2flb 2flc 2fld 2flf 2flg 2flh 2flj 2flk 2fll 2flm 2fln 2flp 2flq 2flr 2fls 2flt 2flv 2flw 2flx 2fly 2flz
g2l 4gl. 2glb 2glc 2gld 2glf 2glg 2glh 2glj 2glk 2gll 2glm 2gln 2glp 2glq 2glr 2gls 2glt 2glv 2glw 2glx 2gly 2glz
k2l 4kl. 2klb 2klc 2kld 2klf 2klg 2klh 2klj 2klk 2kll 2klm 2kln 2klp 2klq 2klr 2kls 2klt 2klv 2klw 2klx 2kly 2klz
p2l 4pl. 2plb 2plc 2pld 2plf 2plg 2plh 2plj 2plk 2pll 2plm 2pln 2plp 2plq 2plr 2pls 2plt 2plv 2plw 2plx 2ply 2plz
v2l 4vl. 2vlb 2vlc 2vld 2vlf 2vlg 2vlh 2vlj 2vlk 2vll 2vlm 2vln 2vlp 2vlq 2vlr 2vls 2vlt 2vlv 2vlw 2vlx 2vly 2vlz
b2r 4br. 2brb 2brc 2brd 2brf 2brg 2brh 2brj 2brk 2brl 2brm 2brn 2brp 2brq 2brr 2brs 2brt 2brv 2brw 2brx 2bry 2brz
c2r 4cr. 2crb 2crc 2crd 2crf 2crg 2crh 2crj 2crk 2crl 2crm 2crn 2crp 2crq 2crr 2crs 2crt 2crv 2crw 2crx 2cry 2crz
d2r 4dr. 2drb 2drc 2drd 2drf 2drg 2drh 2drj 2drk 2drl 2drm 2drn 2drp 2drq 2drr 2drs 2drt 2drv 2drw 2drx 2dry 2drz
f2r 4fr. 2frb 2frc 2frd 2frf 2frg 2frh 2frj 2frk 2frl 2frm 2frn 2frp 2frq 2frr 2frs 2frt 2frv 2frw 2frx 2fry 2frz
g2r 4gr. 2grb 2grc 2grd 2grf 2grg 2grh 2grj 2grk 2grl 2grm 2grn 2grp 2grq 2grr 2grs 2grt 2grv 2grw 2grx 2gry 2grz
k2r 4kr. 2krb 2krc 2krd 2krf 2krg 2krh 2krj 2krk 2krl 2krm 2krn 2krp 2krq 2krr 2krs 2krt 2krv 2krw 2krx 2kry 2krz
p2r 4pr. 2prb 2prc 2prd 2prf 2prg 2prh 2prj 2prk 2prl 2prm 2prn 2prp 2prq 2prr 2prs 2prt 2prv 2prw 2prx 2pry 2prz
r2r 4rr. 2rrb 2rrc 2rrd 2rrf 2rrg 2rrh 2rrj 2rrk 2rrl 2rrm 2rrn 2rrp 2rrq 2rrr 2rrs 2rrt 2rrv 2rrw 2rrx 2rry 2rrz
t2r 4tr. 2trb 2trc 2trd 2trf 2trg 2trh 2trj 2trk 2trl 2trm 2trn 2trp 2trq 2trr 2trs 2trt 2trv 2trw 2trx 2try 2trz
v2r 4vr. 2vrb 2vrc 2vrd 2vrf 2vrg 2vrh 2vrj 2vrk 2vrl 2vrm 2vrn 2vrp 2vrq 2vrr 2vrs 2vrt 2vrv 2vrw 2vrx 2vry 2vrz
2t2l}
